Hawaii statutes.
§92-30 Copy deemed original record. A
photograph, microphotograph, reproduction on film, or electronic copy of a
government record shall be deemed to be an original record for all purposes,
including introduction in evidence in all courts or administrative agencies. A
transcript, exemplification, facsimile, or certified copy thereof, for all
purposes recited in this section, shall be deemed to be a transcript,
exemplification, facsimile, or certified copy of the original record. [L 1945,
c 26, pt of §1; RL 1955, §7-6; HRS §92-30; am L 2005, c 177, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next